Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF318.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 2263XS (1) 91 cm/jh S.F. 318 Section 1. Section 8A.416, Code 2025, is amended by adding 1 the following new subsection: 2 NEW SUBSECTION . 8. For purposes of this section, âraceâ 3 means the same as defined in section 216.2. 4 Sec. 2. Section 15A.1, subsection 1, paragraph b, Code 2025, 5 is amended to read as follows: 6 b. For purposes of this chapter , âeconomic developmentâ : 7 (1) âEconomic developmentâ means private or joint public 8 and private investment involving the creation of new jobs and 9 income or the retention of existing jobs and income that would 10 otherwise be lost. 11 (2) âRaceâ means the same as defined in section 216.2. 12 Sec. 3. Section 19B.1, Code 2025, is amended by adding the 13 following new subsection: 14 NEW SUBSECTION . 1A. âRaceâ means the same as defined in 15 section 216.2. 16 Sec. 4. Section 216.2, Code 2025, is amended by adding the 17 following new subsections: 18 NEW SUBSECTION . 13A. âNatural or protective hairstyleâ 19 includes but is not limited to braids, locs, twists, tight 20 coils or curls, cornrows, bantu knots, afros, and headwraps. 21 NEW SUBSECTION . 16A. âRaceâ is a grouping of humans based 22 upon physical traits commonly or historically associated with a 23 group including but not limited to skin color, hair texture, 24 hair type, or a natural or protective hairstyle. 25 Sec. 5. NEW SECTION . 216.23 Equal rights under the law. 26 1. A person in the state of Iowa shall not be excluded from 27 participation in, be denied the benefits of, or be subjected 28 to discrimination under, any program or activity receiving 29 state financial assistance, based on the personâs natural 30 or protective hairstyle, race, creed, color, sex, sexual 31 orientation, gender identity, national origin, religion, 32 ancestry, or disability. 33 2. A person in the state of Iowa shall not be subjected to 34 a practice prohibited under 42 U.S.C. Â§1981(c), based on the 35 -1- LSB 2263XS (1) 91 cm/jh 1/ 4 S.F. 318 personâs natural or protective hairstyle, race, creed, color, 1 sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, 2 religion, ancestry, or disability. 3 Sec. 6. Section 256.2, Code 2025, is amended by adding the 4 following new subsection: 5 NEW SUBSECTION . 3A. âRaceâ means the same as defined in 6 section 216.2. 7 Sec. 7. Section 256B.2, subsection 1, Code 2025, is amended 8 by adding the following new paragraph: 9 NEW PARAGRAPH . 0b. âRaceâ means the same as defined in 10 section 216.2. 11 Sec. 8. Section 256E.2, Code 2025, is amended by adding the 12 following new subsection: 13 NEW SUBSECTION . 6A. âRaceâ means the same as defined in 14 section 216.2. 15 Sec. 9. Section 256F.2, Code 2025, is amended by adding the 16 following new subsection: 17 NEW SUBSECTION . 6A. âRaceâ means the same as defined in 18 section 216.2. 19 Sec. 10. Section 261A.4, Code 2025, is amended by adding the 20 following new subsection: 21 NEW SUBSECTION . 17. âRaceâ means the same as defined in 22 section 216.2. 23 Sec. 11. Section 279.58, Code 2025, is amended by adding the 24 following new subsection: 25 NEW SUBSECTION . 3. a. The board of directors of a school 26 district shall not adopt, for the district or for an individual 27 school within the district, a dress code policy that prohibits 28 students from wearing natural or protective hairstyles that are 29 commonly or historically associated with a race. 30 b. For purposes of this subsection, âraceâ means the same as 31 defined in section 216.2. 32 Sec. 12. Section 280.2, Code 2025, is amended by adding the 33 following new subsection: 34 NEW SUBSECTION . 3. âRaceâ means the same as defined in 35 -2- LSB 2263XS (1) 91 cm/jh 2/ 4 S.F. 318 section 216.2. 1 Sec. 13. Section 341A.1, Code 2025, is amended by adding the 2 following new subsection: 3 NEW SUBSECTION . 4. âRaceâ means the same as defined in 4 section 216.2. 5 Sec. 14. Section 400.17, Code 2025, is amended by adding the 6 following new subsection: 7 NEW SUBSECTION . 5. For the purposes of this section, âraceâ 8 means the same as defined in section 216.2. 9 Sec. 15. Section 602.1401, Code 2025, is amended by adding 10 the following new subsection: 11 NEW SUBSECTION . 7. For the purposes of this section, âraceâ 12 means the same as defined in section 216.2. 13 Sec. 16. Section 729.4, Code 2025, is amended by adding the 14 following new subsection: 15 NEW SUBSECTION . 4. For the purposes of this section, âraceâ 16 means the same as defined in section 216.2. 17